Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF629.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2638YH (2) 91 jda/jh H.F. 629 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 282.22 Children of military 1 families ââ enrollment in advance of arrival. 2 1. As used in this section: 3 a. âActive dutyâ means full-time duty status in the active 4 uniformed service of the United States, including members of 5 the national guard and reserve on active duty orders pursuant 6 to 10 U.S.C. ch. 1209 and 1211. 7 b. âChild of a military familyâ means a school-aged child, 8 who resides in the household of an active duty member of the 9 uniformed service of the United States, and who is currently 10 enrolled in kindergarten through grade twelve, or will enroll 11 in kindergarten through grade twelve in the immediately 12 subsequent school year. 13 2. The board of directors of a school district shall 14 allow the child of a military family to enroll in the school 15 district prior to residing within the district, or within a 16 federal military installation located contiguous to a county 17 in this state in which the district is located, if the parent 18 or guardian of the child provides evidence to the board of 19 directors that indicates the child will reside within the 20 district, or within a federal military installation located 21 contiguous to a county in this state in which the district 22 is located, during the current school year or during the 23 immediately subsequent school year. A child of a military 24 family shall not be included in the school districtâs actual 25 enrollment under section 257.6, subsection 1, until the child 26 is considered a resident of the school district under section 27 282.1. 28 3. If the child of a military family enrolls in a school 29 district pursuant to subsection 2, and the child has an 30 individualized education program, an individualized family 31 service plan, or a plan under section 504 of the federal 32 Rehabilitation Act, 29 U.S.C. Â§794, the board of directors of 33 the school district shall ensure that the services provided by 34 the school district under the individualized education program, 35 -1- LSB 2638YH (2) 91 jda/jh 1/ 3 H.F. 629 individualized family service plan, or plan under section 504 1 of the federal Rehabilitation Act, 29 U.S.C. Â§794, are, at a 2 minimum, comparable to the services provided to the child at 3 the childâs previous school. 4